Utah statutes.
57-1-19.   Trust deeds -- Definitions of terms.

As used in Sections 57-1-20 through 57-1-36:

(1)  "Beneficiary" means the person named or otherwise designated in a trust deed as the person for whose benefit a trust deed is given, or his successor in interest.

(2)  "Trustor" means the person conveying real property by a trust deed as security for the performance of an obligation.

(3)  "Trust deed" means a deed executed in conformity with Sections 57-1-20 through 57-1-36 and conveying real property to a trustee in trust to secure the performance of an obligation of the trustor or other person named in the deed to a beneficiary.

(4)  "Trustee" means a person to whom title to real property is conveyed by trust deed, or his successor in interest.

(5)  "Real property" has the same meaning as set forth in Section 57-1-1.

(6)  "Trust property" means the real property conveyed by the trust deed.

